District of Columbia statutes.
34-915

Hearings after summary investigation.

If after making such investigation the Commission becomes satisfied that sufficient grounds exist to warrant a formal hearing being ordered as to the matters so investigated, it shall furnish such public utility interested a statement notifying the public utility of the matters under investigation. Ten days after such notice has been given the Commission may proceed to set a time and place for a hearing and an investigation as hereinbefore provided.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 984, ch. 150, § 8, par. 45
1981 Ed., § 43-616.
1973 Ed., § 43-415.